Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2447.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 204 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 204. Exclusions from Tax.--The tax imposed by section 202 shall not be imposed upon any of the following:* * *(77) The sale at retail of firearm safety devices to a purchaser, or nonbusiness use of firearm safety devices by a purchaser, during the exclusion period. The department shall 12345678910111213141516171819202122 publish guidance on its publicly accessible Internet website on the implementation of the exclusion under this clause. For the purposes of this clause, the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings:"Exclusion period" means the six months immediately following the effective date of this clause."Firearm safety device" means any of the following:(i) gun vault;(ii) gun safe;(iii) gun locker;(iv) gun cabinet;(v) trigger lock;(vi) handgun vault;(vii) handgun locker;(viii) gun cable lock;(ix) gun lever lock;(x) handgun safe;(xi) locking gun case with key or combination lock; or(xii) a device which does not allow use of the firearm without a key or combination."Purchaser" means an individual who places an order and pays the purchase price by cash or credit during the exclusion period, even if delivery takes place after the exclusion period.Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.20260HB2447PN3260 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425